Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-9,167
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Nebraska Equal Opportunity in Postsecondary Education Act:

(1) Educational institution means the University of Nebraska, the state colleges, and the community colleges; and

(2) Governing board means the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska, the Board of Trustees of the Nebraska State Colleges, and the community college boards of governors.

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 1087.